Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2539.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2912-D(3) and (4) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2912-D. Application for certification.To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 application on a form prescribed by the department that includes the following:* * *(3) If the computer data center is to qualify under section [2915-D(1)] 2915-D(a)(1), the following information:(i) The anticipated investment associated with the computer data center for which the certification is being sought.(ii) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed in section [2915-D(1)] 2915-D(a)(1).(4) If the computer data center is to qualify under section [2915-D(2)] 2915-D(a)(2), an affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center has satisfied, or will satisfy, the certification requirements prescribed in section [2915-D(2)] 2915-D(a)(2).(4.1) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed under section 2915-D(b).* * *Section 2. Section 2915-D introductory paragraph of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2915-D. Eligibility requirements.(a) Requirements.--A computer data center must meet one of the following requirements, after taking into account the 20260HB2539PN3439 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 combined investments made and annual compensation paid by the owner or operator of the computer data center or the qualified tenant:* * *(b) Environmental certification.--A computer data center must obtain an environmental certification under one of the following standards on or before the second anniversary of certification:(1) LEED for computer data centers at silver level or higher;(2) Energy Star Certification;(3) Green Globe Certification;(4) ISO 50001 Energy Management Certification;(5) ISO 14001 Standard for Environmental Management Systems; or(6) other equivalent standards approved by the Department of Environmental Protection.Section 3. Section 2935-D(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2935-D. Eligibility requirements.(a) General rule.--In order to be certified under this subarticle, an owner or operator of a computer data center must meet all of the following requirements:* * *(3) On or before the second anniversary of certification, obtain environmental certification under one of the following standards:(i) LEED for computer data centers at silver level or higher;(ii) Energy Star certification;20260HB2539PN3439 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Green Globe certification;(iv) ISO 50001 Energy Management certification;(v) ISO 14001 Standard for Environmental Management Systems; or(vi) other equivalent standards approved by the Department of Environmental Protection.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2539PN3439 - 4 - 12345678